Louisiana, session 2026, SB166.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Art. 814(A)(1), (3), and (5) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 814. Responsive verdicts; in particular
A. The only responsive verdicts which may be rendered when the indictment
charges the following offenses are:
1. First Degree Murder:
Guilty.
Guilty of attempted first degree murder.
Guilty of second degree murder.
Guilty of attempted second degree murder.
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-336 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 166
Guilty of manslaughter.
Guilty of attempted manslaughter.
Not guilty.
* * *
3. Second Degree Murder:
Guilty.
Guilty of attempted second degree murder.
Guilty of manslaughter.
Guilty of attempted manslaughter.
Guilty of negligent homicide.
Not guilty.
* * *
5. Manslaughter:
Guilty.
Guilty of attempted manslaughter.
Guilty of negligent homicide.
Not guilty.
* * *
Section 2. Code of Criminal Procedure Art. 814(A)(7) is hereby repealed.